apertium-sl-es.sl.dix
    <pardef n="moj__det">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ega</l>       <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>emu</l>       <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ega</l>       <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>em</l>        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>im</l>        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ih</l>        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ima</l>       <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ih</l>        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ima</l>       <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ih</l>        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>im</l>        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ih</l>        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>imi</l>       <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ih</l>        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ima</l>       <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ih</l>        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ima</l>       <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    
      <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ih</l>        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>im</l>        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ih</l>        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>imi</l>       <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    
      <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ega</l>       <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>emu</l>       <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>em</l>        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>im</l>        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ih</l>        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ima</l>       <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ih</l>        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ima</l>       <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ih</l>        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>im</l>        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ih</l>        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>imi</l>       <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

	<e lm="moj">           <i>moj</i><par n="moj__det"/></e>
